Oklahoma, session 2026, HB4285.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1-245 of Title 63, unless there
is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
There is hereby created in the State Treasury a revolving fund
for the State Department of Health to be designated the "Perinatal
Quality Improvement Revolving Fund". The fund shall be a continuing
fund, not subject to fiscal year limitations, and shall consist of
all monies received by the State Department of Health from state-
appropriated funds, federal funds, donations, grants, and
contributions from any public or private source and designated for
the purpose set forth in this section. All monies accruing to the
credit of said fund are hereby appropriated and may be budgeted and
ENGR. H. B. NO. 4285 Page 1

expe nded by the State Department of Health for the purpose of
working collaboratively with quality improvement initiatives and
entities operating or founded in Oklahoma by reducing preventable
newborn to infant morbidity and mortality, reducing preventable
maternal morbidity and mortality, and improving maternal safety and
overall outcomes. Expenditures from said fund shall be made upon
warrants issued by the State Treasurer against claims filed as
prescribed by law with the Director of the Office of Management and
Enterprise Services for approval and payment.
SECTION 2. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.
Passed the House of Representatives the 24th day of March, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives

Passed the Senate the _____ day of __________, 2026.


Presiding Officer of the Senate






ENGR. H. B. NO. 4285 Page 2